Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3002.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 19 O.S. 2021, Section 130.1, as
amended by Section 1, Chapter 86, O.S.L. 2023 (19 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 130.1), is amended to read as follows:
Section 130.1. There is hereby re-created, to continue until
July 1, 2026 2031, in accordance with the provisions of the Oklahoma
Sunset Law, the Commission on County Government Personnel Education
and Training, hereinafter called the "Commission". The Commission
shall be composed of the following five (5) members: The President
of Oklahoma State University or designee; the State Auditor and
Inspector or designee; the Director of the Department of
Transportation or designee; the Chairman of the Oklahoma Tax
Commission or designee; and the President of the Oklahoma County
Officers Association or designee.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

Passed the House of Representatives the 12th day of March, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 20th day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 3002 Page 2